test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kissa_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - pircco: #KISSA
    pircco+N+Sg+Nom:  pircco
    pircco+N+Sg+Gen:  pirco
    pircco+N+Sg+Acc:  pirco
    pircco+N+Sg+Ill:  piircon
    pircco+N+Sg+Loc:  pirccoost
    pircco+N+Sg+Com:  pirccoin
    pircco+N+Sg+Abe:  pircottáá
    pircco+N+Ess:  pirccon
    pircco+N+Par:  pirccod
    pircco+N+Pl+Nom:  pircoh
    pircco+N+Pl+Gen:  pircoi
    pircco+N+Pl+Acc:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Ill:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Loc:  pircoin
    pircco+N+Pl+Com:  [pircoiguin, pircoigijn]
    pircco+N+Pl+Abe:  pircoittáá

  Noun - riddo: #KISSA
    riddo+N+Sg+Nom:  riddo
    riddo+N+Sg+Gen:  rido
    riddo+N+Sg+Acc:  rido
    riddo+N+Sg+Ill:  riidon
    riddo+N+Sg+Loc:  riddoost
    riddo+N+Sg+Com:  riddoin
    riddo+N+Sg+Abe:  ridottáá
    riddo+N+Ess:  riddon
    riddo+N+Par:  riddod
    riddo+N+Pl+Nom:  ridoh
    riddo+N+Pl+Gen:  ridoi
    riddo+N+Pl+Acc:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Ill:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Loc:  ridoin
    riddo+N+Pl+Com:  [ridoiguin, ridoigijn]
    riddo+N+Pl+Abe:  ridoittáá

  Noun - šiljo: #KISSA
    šiljo+N+Sg+Nom:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Gen:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Acc:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Ill:  šiiljon
    šiljo+N+Sg+Loc:  šiljoost
    šiljo+N+Sg+Com:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Sg+Abe:  šiljottáá
    šiljo+N+Ess:  šiljon
    šiljo+N+Par:  šiljod
    šiljo+N+Pl+Nom:  šiljoh
    šiljo+N+Pl+Gen:  šiljoi
    šiljo+N+Pl+Acc:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Ill:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Loc:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Com:  [šiljoiguin, šiljoigijn]
    šiljo+N+Pl+Abe:  šiljoittáá

  Noun - vihko: #KISSA
    vihko+N+Sg+Nom:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Gen:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Acc:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Ill:  viihkon
    vihko+N+Sg+Loc:  vihkoost
    vihko+N+Sg+Com:  vihkoin
    vihko+N+Sg+Abe:  vihkottáá
    vihko+N+Ess:  vihkon
    vihko+N+Par:  vihkod
    vihko+N+Pl+Nom:  vihkoh
    vihko+N+Pl+Gen:  vihkoi
    vihko+N+Pl+Acc:  vihkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Ill:  vihkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Loc:  vihkoin
    vihko+N+Pl+Com:  [vihkoiguin, vihkoigijn]
    vihko+N+Pl+Abe:  vihkoittáá

  Noun - tinno: #KISSA
    tinno+N+Sg+Nom:  tinno
    tinno+N+Sg+Gen:  tino
    tinno+N+Sg+Acc:  tino
    tinno+N+Sg+Ill:  tiinon
    tinno+N+Sg+Loc:  tinnoost
    tinno+N+Sg+Com:  tinnoin
    tinno+N+Sg+Abe:  tinottáá
    tinno+N+Ess:  tinnon
    tinno+N+Par:  tinnod
    tinno+N+Pl+Nom:  tinoh
    tinno+N+Pl+Gen:  tinoi
    tinno+N+Pl+Acc:  tinnoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Ill:  tinnoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Loc:  tinoin
    tinno+N+Pl+Com:  [tinoiguin, tinoigijn]
    tinno+N+Pl+Abe:  tinoittáá

  Noun - kirno: #KISSA
    kirno+N+Sg+Nom:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Gen:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Acc:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirnon
    kirno+N+Sg+Loc:  kirnoost
    kirno+N+Sg+Com:  kirnoin
    kirno+N+Sg+Abe:  kirnottáá
    kirno+N+Ess:     kirnon
    kirno+N+Par:     kirnod
    kirno+N+Pl+Nom:  kirnoh
    kirno+N+Pl+Gen:  kirnoi
    kirno+N+Pl+Acc:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Ill:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Loc:  kirnoin
    kirno+N+Pl+Com:  [kirnoiguin, kirnoigijn]
    kirno+N+Pl+Abe:  kirnoittáá

  Noun - lippo: #KISSA
    lippo+N+Sg+Nom:  lippo
    lippo+N+Sg+Gen:  lipo
    lippo+N+Sg+Acc:  lipo
    lippo+N+Sg+Ill:  liipon
    lippo+N+Sg+Loc:  lippoost
    lippo+N+Sg+Com:  lippoin
    lippo+N+Sg+Abe:  lipottáá
    lippo+N+Ess:  lippon
    lippo+N+Par:  lippod
    lippo+N+Pl+Nom:  lipoh
    lippo+N+Pl+Gen:  lipoi
    lippo+N+Pl+Acc:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Ill:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Loc:  lipoin
    lippo+N+Pl+Com:  [lipoiguin, lipoigijn]
    lippo+N+Pl+Abe:  lipoittáá

  Noun - rippo: #KISSA
    rippo+N+Sg+Nom:  rippo
    rippo+N+Sg+Gen:  ripo
    rippo+N+Sg+Acc:  ripo
    rippo+N+Sg+Ill:  riipon
    rippo+N+Sg+Loc:  rippoost
    rippo+N+Sg+Com:  rippoin
    rippo+N+Sg+Abe:  ripottáá
    rippo+N+Ess:  rippon
    rippo+N+Par:  rippod
    rippo+N+Pl+Nom:  ripoh
    rippo+N+Pl+Gen:  ripoi
    rippo+N+Pl+Acc:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Ill:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Loc:  ripoin
    rippo+N+Pl+Com:  [ripoiguin, ripoigijn]
    rippo+N+Pl+Abe:  ripoittáá

  Noun - nitro: #KISSA
    nitro+N+Sg+Nom:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Gen:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Acc:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Ill:  niitron
    nitro+N+Sg+Loc:  nitroost
    nitro+N+Sg+Com:  nitroin
    nitro+N+Sg+Abe:  nitrottáá
    nitro+N+Ess:  nitron
    nitro+N+Par:  nitrod
    nitro+N+Pl+Nom:  nitroh
    nitro+N+Pl+Gen:  nitroi
    nitro+N+Pl+Acc:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Ill:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Loc:  nitroin
    nitro+N+Pl+Com:  [nitroiguin, nitroigijn]
    nitro+N+Pl+Abe:  nitroittáá

  Noun - pisso: #KISSA
    pisso+N+Sg+Nom:  pisso
    pisso+N+Sg+Gen:  piso
    pisso+N+Sg+Acc:  piso
    pisso+N+Sg+Ill:  piison
    pisso+N+Sg+Loc:  pissoost
    pisso+N+Sg+Com:  pissoin
    pisso+N+Sg+Abe:  pisottáá
    pisso+N+Ess:  pisson
    pisso+N+Par:  pissod
    pisso+N+Pl+Nom:  pisoh
    pisso+N+Pl+Gen:  pisoi
    pisso+N+Pl+Acc: pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Ill:  pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Loc:  pisoin
    pisso+N+Pl+Com:  [pisoiguin, pisoigijn]
    pisso+N+Pl+Abe:  pisoittáá

  Noun - kisto: #KISSA
    kisto+N+Sg+Nom:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Gen:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Acc:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiston
    kisto+N+Sg+Loc:  kistoost
    kisto+N+Sg+Com:  kistoin
    kisto+N+Sg+Abe:  kistottáá
    kisto+N+Ess:  kiston
    kisto+N+Par:  kistod
    kisto+N+Pl+Nom:  kistoh
    kisto+N+Pl+Gen:  kistoi
    kisto+N+Pl+Acc:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Ill:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Loc:  kistoin
    kisto+N+Pl+Com:  [kistoiguin, kistoigijn]
    kisto+N+Pl+Abe:  kistoittáá

  Noun - listo: #KISSA
    listo+N+Sg+Nom:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Gen:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Acc:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Ill:  liiston
    listo+N+Sg+Loc:  listoost
    listo+N+Sg+Com:  listoin
    listo+N+Sg+Abe:  listottáá
    listo+N+Ess:  liston
    listo+N+Par:  listod
    listo+N+Pl+Nom:  listoh
    listo+N+Pl+Gen:  listoi
    listo+N+Pl+Acc:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Ill:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Loc:  listoin
    listo+N+Pl+Com:  [listoiguin, listoigijn]
    listo+N+Pl+Abe:  listoittáá

  Noun - litto: #KISSA
    litto+N+Sg+Nom:  litto
    litto+N+Sg+Gen:  lito
    litto+N+Sg+Acc:  lito
    litto+N+Sg+Ill:  liiton
    litto+N+Sg+Loc:  littoost
    litto+N+Sg+Com:  littoin
    litto+N+Sg+Abe:  litottáá
    litto+N+Ess:  litton
    litto+N+Par:  littod
    litto+N+Pl+Nom:  litoh
    litto+N+Pl+Gen:  litoi
    litto+N+Pl+Acc:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Ill:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Loc:  litoin
    litto+N+Pl+Com:  [litoiguin, litoigijn]
    litto+N+Pl+Abe:  litoittáá

  Noun - mitto: #KISSA
    mitto+N+Sg+Nom:  mitto
    mitto+N+Sg+Gen:  mito
    mitto+N+Sg+Acc:  mito
    mitto+N+Sg+Ill:  miiton
    mitto+N+Sg+Loc:  mittoost
    mitto+N+Sg+Com:  mittoin
    mitto+N+Sg+Abe:  mitottáá
    mitto+N+Ess:  mitton
    mitto+N+Par:  mittod
    mitto+N+Pl+Nom:  mitoh
    mitto+N+Pl+Gen:  mitoi
    mitto+N+Pl+Acc:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Ill:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Loc:  mitoin
    mitto+N+Pl+Com:  [mitoiguin, mitoigijn]
    mitto+N+Pl+Abe:  mitoittáá

  Noun - tipšo: #KISSA
    tipšo+N+Sg+Nom:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Gen:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Acc:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Ill:  tiipšon
    tipšo+N+Sg+Loc:  tipšoost
    tipšo+N+Sg+Com:  tipšoin
    tipšo+N+Sg+Abe:  tipšottáá
    tipšo+N+Ess:  tipšon
    tipšo+N+Par:  tipšod
    tipšo+N+Pl+Nom:  tipšoh
    tipšo+N+Pl+Gen:  tipšoi
    tipšo+N+Pl+Acc:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Ill:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Loc:  tipšoin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Com:  [tipšoiguin, tipšoigijn]
    tipšo+N+Pl+Abe:  tipšoittáá
  
  Noun - cirrá:
    cirrá+N+Sg+Nom:  cirrá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Gen:  cirá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Acc:  cirá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Ill:  ciirán
    cirrá+N+Sg+Loc:  cirráást
    cirrá+N+Sg+Com:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Sg+Abe:  ciráttáá
    cirrá+N+Ess:  cirrán
    cirrá+N+Par:  cirrád
    cirrá+N+Pl+Nom:  ciráh
    cirrá+N+Pl+Gen:  cirái
    cirrá+N+Pl+Acc:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Ill:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Loc:  ciráin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Com:  [ciráiguin, ciráigijn]
    cirrá+N+Pl+Abe:  ciráittáá

  Noun - kissá:
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom:  kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen:  kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc:  kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill:  kiisán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc:  kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com:  kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe:  kisáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess:  kissán
    kissá+N+Par:  kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom:  kisáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen:  kisái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc:  kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill:  kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc:  kisáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com:  [kisáiguin, kisáigijn]
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe:  kisáittáá

  Noun - kassa: # - ok
    kassa+N+Sg+Nom:  kassa
    kassa+N+Sg+Gen:  kasa
    kassa+N+Sg+Ill:  kaasan
    kassa+N+Sg+Loc:  kassaast
    kassa+N+Sg+Com:  kassain
    kassa+N+Sg+Abe:  kasattáá
    kassa+N+Ess:  kassan
    kassa+N+Par:  kassad
    kassa+N+Pl+Nom:  kasah
    kassa+N+Pl+Gen:  kasai
    kassa+N+Pl+Acc:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Ill:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Loc:  kasain
    kassa+N+Pl+Com:  [kasaiguin, kasaigijn]
    kassa+N+Pl+Abe:  kasaittáá

  Noun - pittá:
    pittá+N+Sg+Nom:  pittá
    pittá+N+Sg+Gen:  pitá
    pittá+N+Sg+Acc:  pitá
    pittá+N+Sg+Ill:  piitán
    pittá+N+Sg+Loc:  pittáást
    pittá+N+Sg+Com:  pittáin
    pittá+N+Sg+Abe:  pitáttáá
    pittá+N+Ess:  pittán
    pittá+N+Par: pittád
    pittá+N+Pl+Nom:  pitáh
    pittá+N+Pl+Gen:  pitái
    pittá+N+Pl+Acc:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Ill:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Loc:  pitáin
    pittá+N+Pl+Com:  [pitáiguin, pitáigijn]
    pittá+N+Pl+Abe:  pitáittáá

  Noun - hellá: # - ok
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom:  hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen:  helá
    hellá+N+Sg+Acc:  helá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill:  heelán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc:  helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com:  helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe:  heláttáá
    hellá+N+Ess:  hellán
    hellá+N+Par:  hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom:  heláh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen:  helái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc:  heláin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com:  [heláiguin, heláigijn]
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe:  heláittáá

  Noun - pálstá:
    pálstá+N+Sg+Nom:  pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Gen:  pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Acc: pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Ill:  páálstán
    pálstá+N+Sg+Loc:  pálstáást
    pálstá+N+Sg+Com:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Sg+Abe:  pálstáttáá
    pálstá+N+Ess:  pálstán
    pálstá+N+Par: pálstád
    pálstá+N+Pl+Nom:  pálstáh
    pálstá+N+Pl+Gen:  pálstái
    pálstá+N+Pl+Acc:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Ill:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Loc:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Com:  [pálstáiguin, pálstáigijn]
    pálstá+N+Pl+Abe:  pálstáittáá

  Noun - liljá:
    liljá+N+Sg+Nom:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Gen:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Acc:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Ill:  liilján
    liljá+N+Sg+Loc:  liljáást
    liljá+N+Sg+Com:  liljáin
    liljá+N+Sg+Abe:  liljáttáá
    liljá+N+Ess:  lilján
    liljá+N+Par: liljád
    liljá+N+Pl+Nom:  liljáh
    liljá+N+Pl+Gen:  liljái
    liljá+N+Pl+Acc: liljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Ill:  liljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Loc: liljáin
    liljá+N+Pl+Com:  [liljáiguin, liljáigijn]
    liljá+N+Pl+Abe:  liljáittáá

  Noun - tiljá:
    tiljá+N+Sg+Nom:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Gen:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Acc:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Ill:  tiilján
    tiljá+N+Sg+Loc:  tiljáást
    tiljá+N+Sg+Com:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Sg+Abe:  tiljáttáá
    tiljá+N+Ess:  tilján
    tiljá+N+Par:  tiljád
    tiljá+N+Pl+Nom:  tiljáh
    tiljá+N+Pl+Gen:  tiljái
    tiljá+N+Pl+Acc:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Ill:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Loc:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Com:  [tiljáiguin, tiljáigijn]
    tiljá+N+Pl+Abe:  tiljáittáá

  Noun - linjá:
    linjá+N+Sg+Nom:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Acc:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Ill:  liinján
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc:  linjáást
    linjá+N+Sg+Com:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Sg+Abe:  linjáttáá
    linjá+N+Ess:  linján
    linjá+N+Par:  linjád
    linjá+N+Pl+Nom:  linjáh
    linjá+N+Pl+Gen:  linjái
    linjá+N+Pl+Acc:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Ill:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Loc:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com:  [linjáiguin, linjáigijn]
    linjá+N+Pl+Abe:  linjáittáá
